Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2223
Real Property Appraiser Board; powers and duties; rules and regulations.

(1) The Real Property Appraiser Board shall administer and enforce the Real Property Appraiser Act and may:

(a) Receive applications for credentialing under the act, process such applications and regulate the issuance of credentials to qualified applicants, and maintain a directory of the names and addresses of persons who receive credentials under the act;

(b) Hold meetings, public hearings, informal conferences, and administrative hearings, prepare or cause to be prepared specifications for all real property appraiser classifications, solicit bids and enter into contracts with one or more testing services, and administer or contract for the administration of examinations approved by the Appraiser Qualifications Board in such places and at such times as deemed appropriate;

(c) Develop the specifications for credentialing examinations, including timing, location, and security necessary to maintain the integrity of the examinations;

(d) Review the procedures and criteria of a contracted testing service to ensure that the testing meets with the approval of the Appraiser Qualifications Board;

(e) Collect all fees required or permitted by the act. The Real Property Appraiser Board shall remit all such receipts to the State Treasurer for credit to the Real Property Appraiser Fund. In addition, the board may collect and transmit to the appropriate federal authority any fees established under the Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989;

(f) Establish appropriate administrative procedures for disciplinary proceedings conducted pursuant to the Real Property Appraiser Act;

(g) Issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, documents, records, and other papers, administer oaths, and take testimony and require submission of and receive evidence concerning all matters within its jurisdiction. In case of disobedience of a subpoena, the Real Property Appraiser Board may make application to the district court of Lancaster County to require the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of documentary evidence. If any person fails to obey an order of the court, he or she may be punished by the court as for contempt thereof;

(h) Deny an application or censure, suspend, or revoke a credential if it finds that the applicant or credential holder has committed any of the acts or omissions set forth in section 76-2238 or otherwise violated the act. Any disciplinary matter may be resolved through informal disposition pursuant to section 84-913;

(i) Take appropriate disciplinary action against a credential holder if the Real Property Appraiser Board determines that a credential holder has violated any provision of the act or the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice;

(j) Enter into consent decrees and issue cease and desist orders upon a determination that a violation of the act has occurred;

(k) Promote research and conduct studies relating to the profession of real property appraisal, sponsor real property appraisal educational activities, and incur, collect fees for, and pay the necessary expenses in connection with activities which shall be open to all credential holders;

(l) Establish and adopt minimum standards for appraisals as required under section 76-2237;

(m) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the act. The rules and regulations may include provisions establishing minimum standards for education providers, courses, and instructors. The rules and regulations shall be adopted and promulgated pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act; and

(n) Do all other things necessary to carry out the Real Property Appraiser Act.

(2) The Real Property Appraiser Board shall also administer and enforce the Nebraska Appraisal Management Company Registration Act.

Laws 1990, LB 1153, § 23;

Laws 1991, LB 203, § 24;

Laws 1994, LB 1107, § 19;

Laws 2001, LB 162, § 15;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 43;

Laws 2007, LB186, § 8;

Laws 2008, LB1011, § 6;

Laws 2010, LB931, § 7;

Laws 2011, LB410, § 21;

Laws 2012, LB714, § 3;

Laws 2014, LB717, § 13;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 43;

Laws 2020, LB808, § 71.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.

Nebraska Appraisal Management Company Registration Act, see section 76-3201.